Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1980
Applicability of act and laws.

The Title Insurers Act shall apply to all persons engaged in the business of title insurance in this state.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in the act and except when the context otherwise requires, all provisions of the laws of this state applying to insurance and insurers generally shall apply to title insurance and title insurers.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 3.